apertium-nld-0.2.0/apertium-nld.nld.dix
<pardef n="ta/ak__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l>ak</l>        <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aks</l>       <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ken</l>       <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kens</l>      <r>ak<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ha/af__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l>af</l>        <r>af<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>afs</l>       <r>af<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ven</l>       <r>af<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vens</l>      <r>af<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="smetvrees__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="akst__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="zoneclips__n_mf"> <!-- posss -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="zwei__n_mf"> <!-- posss -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="da/ad__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ads</l>       <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>den</l>       <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dens</l>      <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sjwa__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'s'</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="doorsne/e__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>den</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dens</l>      <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bo/on__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ons</l>       <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nens</l>      <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="reuzenschildpad__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>den</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="do/os__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os'</l>       <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zen</l>       <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zens</l>      <r>os<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nok__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ken</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pe/er__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ren</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rens</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ta/al__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l>al</l>        <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>als</l>       <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lens</l>      <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="rib__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ben</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="me/et__n_mf">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ten</l>       <r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tens</l>      <r>et<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="topic__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s'</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/>s<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="aso">             <i>aso</i><par n="sjwa__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="atmosfeer">       <i>atmosfe</i><par n="pe/er__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="bolletjestrui">   <i>bolletjestrui</i><par n="zwei__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="bovenkaak">       <i>bovenka</i><par n="ta/ak__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="postkaart">       <i>postkaart</i><par n="akst__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="chordofoon">      <i>chordofo</i><par n="bo/on__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="creooltaal">      <i>creoolta</i><par n="ta/al__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="daad">            <i>da</i><par n="da/ad__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="doorsnee">        <i>doorsne</i><par n="doorsne/e__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="doos">            <i>do</i><par n="do/os__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="eclips">          <i>eclips</i><par n="zoneclips__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="excerpt">         <i>excerpt</i><par n="topic__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ferry">           <i>ferry</i><par n="sjwa__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="haaf">            <i>ha</i><par n="ha/af__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="hagelbui">        <i>hagelbui</i><par n="zwei__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="hauw">            <i>hauw</i><par n="akst__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="icoon">           <i>ico</i><par n="bo/on__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="jachttaal">       <i>jachtta</i><par n="ta/al__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="kaars">           <i>kaars</i><par n="zoneclips__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="kaasschaaf">      <i>kaasscha</i><par n="ha/af__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="klaproos">        <i>klapro</i><par n="do/os__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="kledingzaak">     <i>kledingza</i><par n="ta/ak__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="klok">            <i>klok</i><par n="nok__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="krab">            <i>krab</i><par n="rib__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="kwab">            <i>kwab</i><par n="rib__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="kweepeer">        <i>kweepe</i><par n="pe/er__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="legenda">         <i>legenda</i><par n="sjwa__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="lok">             <i>lok</i><par n="nok__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="loopgraaf">       <i>loopgra</i><par n="ha/af__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="magnetosfeer">    <i>magnetosfe</i><par n="pe/er__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="meet">            <i>me</i><par n="me/et__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="minderheidstaal"> <i>minderheidsta</i><par n="ta/al__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="misdaad">         <i>misda</i><par n="da/ad__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="moerasschildpad"> <i>moerasschildpad</i><par n="reuzenschildpad__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="moerbei">         <i>moerbei</i><par n="zwei__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="monopolie">       <i>monopolie</i><par n="topic__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="munitie">         <i>munitie</i><par n="smetvrees__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="naaidoos">        <i>naaido</i><par n="do/os__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="noodklok">        <i>noodklok</i><par n="nok__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="onderkaak">       <i>onderka</i><par n="ta/ak__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="oorlogsmisdaad">  <i>oorlogsmisda</i><par n="da/ad__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="ophokplicht">     <i>ophokplicht</i><par n="akst__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="piano">           <i>piano</i><par n="sjwa__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="plaats">          <i>plaats</i><par n="zoneclips__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="planeet">         <i>plane</i><par n="me/et__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="poos">            <i>po</i><par n="do/os__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="pronkboon">       <i>pronkbo</i><par n="bo/on__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="reet">            <i>re</i><par n="me/et__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="reuzenschildpad"> <i>reuzenschildpad</i><par n="reuzenschildpad__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="rib">             <i>rib</i><par n="rib__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="schaaf">          <i>scha</i><par n="ha/af__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="schalmei">        <i>schalmei</i><par n="zwei__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="sfeer">           <i>sfe</i><par n="pe/er__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="smetvrees">       <i>smetvrees</i><par n="smetvrees__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="vrees">           <i>vrees</i><par n="smetvrees__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="sneeuwvlok">      <i>sneeuwvlok</i><par n="nok__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="sperzieboon">     <i>sperziebo</i><par n="bo/on__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="spleet">          <i>sple</i><par n="me/et__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="stofoorzaak">     <i>stofoorza</i><par n="ta/ak__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="straattaal">      <i>straatta</i><par n="ta/al__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="vijl">            <i>vijl</i><par n="akst__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="weldaad">         <i>welda</i><par n="da/ad__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="wiers">           <i>wiers</i><par n="zoneclips__n_mf"/></e>
<e lm="zakendiner">      <i>zakendiner</i><par n="topic__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="zeekrab">         <i>zeekrab</i><par n="rib__n_mf"/></e>
